North Carolina statutes. Chapter 120. General Assembly.
Article 27. The Joint Legislative Oversight Committee On Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services. [Repealed]

§§ 120-240 through 120-244.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-291, s. 1.6(b), effective June 24, 2011.

History.

S. 120-240; 2000-83, s. 2; repealed by 2011-291, s. 1.6(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-241; 2000-83, s. 2; repealed by 2011-291, s. 1.6(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-242; 2000-83, s. 2; repealed by 2011-291, s. 1.6(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-243; 2003-58, s. 4; repealed by 2011-291, s. 1.6(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-244; 2006-32, s. 1; repealed by 2011-291, s. 1.6(b), effective June 24, 2011.